Ohio, session 136, HB299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3501.01, 3501.38, 3503.06, 6
3519.05, and 3519.06 be amended and section 3519.11 of the 7
Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 8
Sec. 3501.01. As used in the sections of the Revised Code 9
relating to elections and political communications: 10
(A) "General election" means the election held on the 11
first Tuesday after the first Monday in each November. 12
(B) "Regular municipal election" means the election held 13
on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each 14
odd-numbered year. 15
(C) "Regular state election" means the election held on 16
the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each 17
even-numbered year. 18

H. B. No. 299 Page 2
As Introduced
(D) "Special election" means any election other than those 19
elections defined in other divisions of this section. A special 20
election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first 21
Monday in May or November, on the first Tuesday after the first 22
Monday in August in accordance with section 3501.022 of the 23
Revised Code, or on the day authorized by a particular municipal 24
or county charter for the holding of a primary election, except 25
that in any year in which a presidential primary election is 26
held, no special election shall be held in May, except as 27
authorized by a municipal or county charter, but may be held on 28
the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March. 29
(E)(1) "Primary" or "primary election" means an election 30
held for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates of 31
political parties for election to offices, and for the purpose 32
of electing persons as members of the controlling committees of 33
political parties and as delegates and alternates to the 34
conventions of political parties. Primary elections shall be 35
held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May of each 36
year except in years in which a presidential primary election is 37
held. 38
(2) "Presidential primary election" means a primary 39
election as defined by division (E)(1) of this section at which 40
an election is held for the purpose of choosing delegates and 41
alternates to the national conventions of the major political 42
parties pursuant to section 3513.12 of the Revised Code. Unless 43
otherwise specified, presidential primary elections are included 44
in references to primary elections. In years in which a 45
presidential primary election is held, all primary elections 46
shall be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in 47
March except as otherwise authorized by a municipal or county 48
charter. 49

H. B. No. 299 Page 3
As Introduced
(F) "Political party" means any group of voters meeting 50
the requirements set forth in section 3517.01 of the Revised 51
Code for the formation and existence of a political party. 52
(1) "Major political party" means any political party 53
organized under the laws of this state whose candidate for 54
governor or nominees for presidential electors received not less 55
than twenty per cent of the total vote cast for such office at 56
the most recent regular state election. 57
(2) "Minor political party" means any political party 58
organized under the laws of this state that meets either of the 59
following requirements: 60
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the 61
political party's candidate for governor or nominees for 62
presidential electors received less than twenty per cent but not 63
less than three per cent of the total vote cast for such office 64
at the most recent regular state election. A political party 65
that meets the requirements of this division remains a political 66
party for a period of four years after meeting those 67
requirements. 68
(b) The political party has filed with the secretary of 69
state, subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of 70
division (F)(2)(a) of this section, a petition that meets the 71
requirements of section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. 72
A newly formed political party shall be known as a minor 73
political party until the time of the first election for 74
governor or president which occurs not less than twelve months 75
subsequent to the formation of such party, after which election 76
the status of such party shall be determined by the vote for the 77
office of governor or president. 78

H. B. No. 299 Page 4
As Introduced
(G) "Dominant party in a precinct" or "dominant political 79
party in a precinct" means that political party whose candidate 80
for election to the office of governor at the most recent 81
regular state election at which a governor was elected received 82
more votes than any other person received for election to that 83
office in such precinct at such election. 84
(H) "Candidate" means any qualified person certified in 85
accordance with the provisions of the Revised Code for placement 86
on the official ballot of a primary, general, or special 87
election to be held in this state, or any qualified person who 88
claims to be a write-in candidate, or who knowingly assents to 89
being represented as a write-in candidate by another at either a 90
primary, general, or special election to be held in this state. 91
(I) "Independent candidate" means any candidate who claims 92
not to be affiliated with a political party, and whose name has 93
been certified on the office-type ballot at a general or special 94
election through the filing of a statement of candidacy and 95
nominating petition, as prescribed in section 3513.257 of the 96
Revised Code. 97
(J) "Nonpartisan candidate" means any candidate whose name 98
is required, pursuant to section 3505.04 of the Revised Code, to 99
be listed on the nonpartisan ballot, including all candidates 100
for judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common 101
pleas, for member of any board of education, for municipal or 102
township offices in which primary elections are not held for 103
nominating candidates by political parties, and for offices of 104
municipal corporations having charters that provide for separate 105
ballots for elections for these offices. 106
(K) "Party candidate" means any candidate who claims to be 107
a member of a political party and who has been certified to 108

H. B. No. 299 Page 5
As Introduced
appear on the office-type ballot at a general or special 109
election as the nominee of a political party because the 110
candidate has won the primary election of the candidate's party 111
for the public office the candidate seeks, has been nominated 112
under section 3517.012, or is selected by party committee in 113
accordance with section 3513.31 of the Revised Code. 114
(L) "Officer of a political party" includes, but is not 115
limited to, any member, elected or appointed, of a controlling 116
committee, whether representing the territory of the state, a 117
district therein, a county, township, a city, a ward, a 118
precinct, or other territory, of a major or minor political 119
party. 120
(M) "Question or issue" means any question or issue 121
certified in accordance with the Revised Code for placement on 122
an official ballot at a general or special election to be held 123
in this state. 124
(N) "Elector" or "qualified elector" means a person having 125
the qualifications provided by law to be entitled to vote. 126
(O) "Voter" means an elector who votes at an election. 127
(P) "Voting residence" means that place of residence of an 128
elector which shall determine the precinct in which the elector 129
may vote. 130
(Q) "Precinct" means a district within a county 131
established by the board of elections of such county within 132
which all qualified electors having a voting residence therein 133
may vote at the same polling place. 134
(R) "Polling place" means that place provided for each 135
precinct at which the electors having a voting residence in such 136
precinct may vote. 137

H. B. No. 299 Page 6
As Introduced
(S) "Board" or "board of elections" means the board of 138
elections appointed in a county pursuant to section 3501.06 of 139
the Revised Code. 140
(T) "Political subdivision" means a county, township, 141
city, village, or school district. 142
(U) "Election officer" or "election official" means any of 143
the following: 144
(1) Secretary of state; 145
(2) Employees of the secretary of state serving the 146
division of elections in the capacity of attorney, 147
administrative officer, administrative assistant, elections 148
administrator, office manager, or clerical supervisor; 149
(3) Director of a board of elections; 150
(4) Deputy director of a board of elections; 151
(5) Member of a board of elections; 152
(6) Employees of a board of elections; 153
(7) Precinct election officials; 154
(8) Employees appointed by the boards of elections on a 155
temporary or part-time basis. 156
(V) "Acknowledgment notice" means a notice sent by a board 157
of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, 158
informing a voter registration applicant or an applicant who 159
wishes to change the applicant's residence or name of the status 160
of the application; the information necessary to complete or 161
update the application, if any; and if the application is 162
complete, the precinct in which the applicant is to vote. 163
(W) "Confirmation notice" means a notice sent by a board 164

H. B. No. 299 Page 7
As Introduced
of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, to 165
a registered elector to confirm the registered elector's current 166
address. 167
(X) "Designated agency" means an office or agency in the 168
state that provides public assistance or that provides state- 169
funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to 170
persons with disabilities and that is required by the National 171
Voter Registration Act of 1993 to implement a program designed 172
and administered by the secretary of state for registering 173
voters, or any other public or government office or agency that 174
implements a program designed and administered by the secretary 175
of state for registering voters, including the department of job 176
and family services, the program administered under section 177
3701.132 of the Revised Code by the department of health, the 178
department of mental health and addiction services, the 179
department of developmental disabilities, the opportunities for 180
Ohioans with disabilities agency, and any other agency the 181
secretary of state designates. "Designated agency" does not 182
include public high schools and vocational schools, public 183
libraries, or the office of a county treasurer. 184
(Y) "National Voter Registration Act of 1993" means the 185
"National Voter Registration Act of 1993," 107 Stat. 77, 42 186
U.S.C.A. 1973gg. 187
(Z) "Voting Rights Act of 1965" means the "Voting Rights 188
Act of 1965," 79 Stat. 437, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973, as amended. 189
(AA)(1) "Photo identification" means one of the following 190
documents that includes the individual's name and photograph and 191
is not expired: 192
(a) An Ohio driver's license, state identification card, 193

H. B. No. 299 Page 8
As Introduced
or interim identification form issued by the registrar of motor 194
vehicles or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of 195
the Revised Code; 196
(b) A United States passport or passport card; 197
(c) A United States military identification card, Ohio 198
national guard identification card, or United States department 199
of veterans affairs identification card. 200
(2) A "copy" of an individual's photo identification means 201
images of both the front and back of a document described in 202
division (AA)(1) of this section, except that if the document is 203
a United States passport, a copy of the photo identification 204
means an image of the passport's identification page that 205
includes the individual's name, photograph, and other 206
identifying information and the passport's expiration date. 207
(BB) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued 208
by the registrar or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 209
4507. of the Revised Code that authorizes an individual to 210
drive. "Driver's license" includes a driver's license, 211
commercial driver's license, probationary license, restricted 212
license, motorcycle operator's license, or temporary instruction 213
permit identification card. "Driver's license" does not include 214
a limited term license issued under section 4507.09 of the 215
Revised Code. 216
(CC) "State identification card" means a card issued by 217
the registrar or a deputy registrar under sections 4507.50 to 218
4507.52 of the Revised Code. 219
(DD) "Interim identification form" means the document 220
issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar to an applicant 221
for a driver's license or state identification card that 222

H. B. No. 299 Page 9
As Introduced
contains all of the information otherwise found on the license 223
or card and that an applicant may use as a form of 224
identification until the physical license or card arrives in the 225
mail. 226
(EE) "Statewide initiative petition" means an initiative 227
petition for the submission of a proposed law or constitutional 228
amendment to the electors of the state, including any 229
supplementary petition for additional signatures to such an 230
initiative petition. 231
Sec. 3501.38. All declarations of candidacy, nominating 232
petitions, or other petitions presented to or filed with the 233
secretary of state or a board of elections or with any other 234
public office for the purpose of becoming a candidate for any 235
nomination or office or for the holding of an election on any 236
issue shall, in addition to meeting the other specific 237
requirements prescribed in the sections of the Revised Code 238
relating to them, be governed by the following rules: 239
(A) Only electors qualified to vote on the candidacy or 240
issue which is the subject of the petition shall sign a 241
petition. Each signer shall be a registered elector pursuant to 242
section 3503.01 of the Revised Code. The facts of qualification 243
shall be determined as of the date when the petition is filed. 244
(B) Signatures shall be affixed in ink. Each signer may 245
also print the signer's name, so as to clearly identify the 246
signer's signature. 247
(C) Each signer shall place on the petition after the 248
signer's name the date of signing and the location of the 249
signer's voting residence, including the street and number if in 250
a municipal corporation or the rural route number, post office 251

H. B. No. 299 Page 10
As Introduced
address, or township if outside a municipal corporation. The 252
voting address given on the petition shall be the address 253
appearing in the registration records at the board of elections. 254
(D) Except as otherwise provided in section 3501.382 of 255
the Revised Code, no person shall write any name other than the 256
person's own on any petition. Except as otherwise provided in 257
section 3501.382 of the Revised Code, no person may authorize 258
another to sign for the person. If a petition contains the 259
signature of an elector two or more times, only the first 260
signature shall be counted. 261
(E)(1) On each petition paper, the circulator shall 262
indicate the number of signatures contained on it, and shall 263
sign a statement made under penalty of election falsification 264
that the circulator witnessed the affixing of every signature, 265
that all signers were to the best of the circulator's knowledge 266
and belief qualified to sign, and that every signature is to the 267
best of the circulator's knowledge and belief the signature of 268
the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney 269
in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. 270
On the circulator's statement for a declaration of candidacy or 271
nominating petition for a person seeking to become a statewide 272
candidate, for a statewide initiative or a statewide referendum 273
petition, or for a party formation petition described in 274
division (A)(1)(b) of section 3517.01 of the Revised Code, the 275
circulator shall identify the circulator's name, the address of 276
the circulator's permanent residence, and the name and address 277
of the person employing the circulator to circulate the 278
petition, if any. On the circulator's statement for a statewide 279
initiative petition, the circulator also shall write the 280
circulator's circulator license number issued under section 281
3519.11 of the Revised Code. 282

H. B. No. 299 Page 11
As Introduced
(2) As used in division (E) of this section, "statewide 283
candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of 284
governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office 285
of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, or 286
attorney general. 287
(F) Except as otherwise provided in section 3501.382 of 288
the Revised Code, if a circulator knowingly permits an 289
unqualified person to sign a petition paper or permits a person 290
to write a name other than the person's own on a petition paper, 291
that petition paper is invalid; otherwise, the signature of a 292
person not qualified to sign shall be rejected but shall not 293
invalidate the other valid signatures on the paper. 294
(G) The circulator of a petition may, before filing it in 295
a public office, strike from it any signature the circulator 296
does not wish to present as a part of the petition. 297
(H) Any signer of a petition or an attorney in fact acting 298
pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code on behalf of a 299
signer may remove the signer's signature from that petition at 300
any time before the petition is filed in a public office by 301
striking the signer's name from the petition; no signature may 302
be removed after the petition is filed in any public office. 303
(I)(1) No alterations, corrections, or additions may be 304
made to a petition after it is filed in a public office. 305
(2)(a) No declaration of candidacy, nominating petition, 306
or other petition for the purpose of becoming a candidate may be 307
withdrawn after it is filed in a public office. Nothing in this 308
division prohibits a person from withdrawing as a candidate as 309
otherwise provided by law. 310
(b) No petition presented to or filed with the secretary 311

H. B. No. 299 Page 12
As Introduced
of state, a board of elections, or any other public office for 312
the purpose of the holding of an election on any question or 313
issue may be resubmitted after it is withdrawn from a public 314
office or rejected as containing insufficient signatures. 315
Nothing in this division prevents a question or issue petition 316
from being withdrawn by the filing of a written notice of the 317
withdrawal by a majority of the members of the petitioning 318
committee with the same public office with which the petition 319
was filed prior to the sixtieth day before the election at which 320
the question or issue is scheduled to appear on the ballot. 321
(J) All declarations of candidacy, nominating petitions, 322
or other petitions under this section shall be accompanied by 323
the following statement in boldface capital letters: WHOEVER 324
COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE 325
FIFTH DEGREE. 326
(K) All separate petition papers shall be filed at the 327
same time, as one instrument. 328
(L) If a board of elections distributes for use a petition 329
form for a declaration of candidacy, nominating petition, or any 330
type of question or issue petition that does not satisfy the 331
requirements of law as of the date of that distribution, the 332
board shall not invalidate the petition on the basis that the 333
petition form does not satisfy the requirements of law, if the 334
petition otherwise is valid. Division (L) of this section 335
applies only if the candidate received the petition from the 336
board within ninety days of when the petition is required to be 337
filed. 338
(M)(1) Upon receiving an initiative petition, or a 339
petition filed under section 307.94 or 307.95 of the Revised 340
Code, concerning a ballot issue that is to be submitted to the 341

H. B. No. 299 Page 13
As Introduced
electors of a county or municipal political subdivision, the 342
board of elections shall examine the petition to determine: 343
(a) Whether the petition falls within the scope of a 344
municipal political subdivision's authority to enact via 345
initiative, including, if applicable, the limitations placed by 346
Sections 3 and 7 of Article XVIII of the Ohio Constitution on 347
the authority of municipal corporations to adopt local police, 348
sanitary, and other similar regulations as are not in conflict 349
with general laws, and whether the petition satisfies the 350
statutory prerequisites to place the issue on the ballot. The 351
petition shall be invalid if any portion of the petition is not 352
within the initiative power; or 353
(b) Whether the petition falls within the scope of a 354
county's authority to enact via initiative, including whether 355
the petition conforms to the requirements set forth in Section 3 356
of Article X of the Ohio Constitution, including the exercise of 357
only those powers that have vested in, and the performance of 358
all duties imposed upon counties and county officers by law, and 359
whether the petition satisfies the statutory prerequisites to 360
place the issue on the ballot. The finding of the board shall be 361
subject to challenge by a protest filed pursuant to division (B) 362
of section 307.95 of the Revised Code. 363
(2) After making a determination under division (M)(1)(a) 364
or (b) of this section, the board of elections shall promptly 365
transmit a copy of the petition and a notice of the board's 366
determination to the office of the secretary of state. Notice of 367
the board's determination shall be given to the petitioners and 368
the political subdivision. 369
(3) If multiple substantially similar initiative petitions 370
are submitted to multiple boards of elections and the 371

H. B. No. 299 Page 14
As Introduced
determinations of the boards under division (M)(1)(a) or (b) of 372
this section concerning those petitions differ, the secretary of 373
state shall make a single determination under division (M)(1)(a) 374
or (b) of this section that shall apply to each such initiative 375
petition. 376
Sec. 3503.06. (A) No person shall be entitled to vote at 377
any election, unless the person is registered as an elector and 378
will have resided in the county and precinct where the person is 379
registered for at least thirty days at the time of the next 380
election. 381
(B) No person shall be entitled to sign any petition, 382
unless the person is registered as an elector and resides in a 383
precinct in which the candidacy or issue that is the subject of 384
the petition will appear on the ballot. 385
(C)(1)(a) Except for a nominating petition for 386
presidential electors, no person shall be entitled to circulate 387
any petition unless the person is a resident of this state and 388
is at least eighteen years of age. In the case of a statewide 389
initiative petition, the person also shall hold a valid 390
circulator license issued under section 3519.11 of the Revised 391
Code. 392
(b) No person shall be entitled to circulate a nominating 393
petition for presidential electors unless the person is at least 394
eighteen years of age. 395
(2) All election officials, in determining the residence 396
of a person circulating a petition under division (C)(1) of this 397
section, shall be governed by the following rules: 398
(a) That place shall be considered the residence of a 399
person in which the person's habitation is fixed and to which, 400

H. B. No. 299 Page 15
As Introduced
whenever the person is absent, the person has the intention of 401
returning. 402
(b) A person shall not be considered to have lost the 403
person's residence who leaves the person's home and goes into 404
another state for temporary purposes only, with the intention of 405
returning. 406
(c) A person shall not be considered to have gained a 407
residence in any county of this state into which the person 408
comes for temporary purposes only, without the intention of 409
making that county the permanent place of abode. 410
(d) If a person removes to another state with the 411
intention of making that state the person's residence, the 412
person shall be considered to have lost the person's residence 413
in this state. 414
(e) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2)(f) of 415
this section, if a person removes from this state and 416
continuously resides outside this state for a period of four 417
years or more, the person shall be considered to have lost the 418
person's residence in this state, notwithstanding the fact that 419
the person may entertain an intention to return at some future 420
period. 421
(f) If a person removes from this state to engage in the 422
services of the United States government, the person shall not 423
be considered to have lost the person's residence in this state 424
during the period of that service, and likewise should the 425
person enter the employment of the state, the place where that 426
person resided at the time of the person's removal shall be 427
considered to be the person's place of residence. 428
(g) If a person goes into another state and, while there, 429

H. B. No. 299 Page 16
As Introduced
exercises the right of a citizen by voting, the person shall be 430
considered to have lost the person's residence in this state. 431
Sec. 3519.05. (A) If the measure to be submitted proposes 432
a constitutional amendment, the heading of each part of the 433
petition shall be prepared in the following form, and printed in 434
capital letters in type of the approximate size set forth: 435
"INITIATIVE PETITION 436
Amendment to the Constitution 437
Proposed by Initiative Petition 438
To be submitted directly to the electors" 439
"Amendment" printed in fourteen-point boldface type shall 440
precede the title, which shall be briefly expressed and printed 441
in eight-point type. The summary shall then be set forth printed 442
in ten-point type, and then shall follow the certification of 443
the attorney general, under proper date, which shall also be 444
printed in ten-point type. The petition shall then set forth the 445
names and addresses of the committee of not less than three nor 446
more than five to represent the petitioners in all matters 447
relating to the petition or its circulation. 448
Immediately above the heading of the place for signatures 449
on each part of the petition the following notice shall be 450
printed in boldface type: 451
"NOTICE 452
Whoever knowingly signs this petition more than once; 453
except as provided in section 3501.382 of the Revised Code, 454
signs a name other than one's own on this petition; or signs 455
this petition when not a qualified voter, is liable to 456
prosecution." 457

H. B. No. 299 Page 17
As Introduced
The heading of the place for signatures shall be 458
substantially as follows: 459
"(Sign with ink. Your name, residence, and date of signing must 460
be given.) 461
_______________________________________________________________ 462
463
1 2 3 4 5 6 7
A Rural Route or
B other Post-
C Signature County Township office Address Month Day Year
_______________________________________________________________ 464
(Voters who do not live in a municipal corporation should fill 465
in the information called for by headings printed above.) 466
(Voters who reside in municipal corporations should fill in the 467
information called for by headings printed below.) 468
_______________________________________________________________ 469
470
1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9
A City Street
B or and
C Signature County Village Number Ward Precinct Month Day Year"
_______________________________________________________________ 471
The text of the proposed amendment shall be printed in 472

H. B. No. 299 Page 18
As Introduced
full, immediately following the place for signatures, and shall 473
be prefaced by "Be it resolved by the people of the State of 474
Ohio." Immediately following the text of the proposed amendment 475
must appear the following form: 476
"I, _________, declare under penalty of election 477
falsification that I am the circulator of the foregoing petition 478
paper containing the signatures of _________ electors, that the 479
signatures appended hereto were made and appended in my presence 480
on the date set opposite each respective name, and are the 481
signatures of the persons whose names they purport to be or of 482
attorneys in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the 483
Revised Code, and that the electors signing this petition did so 484
with knowledge of the contents of same. I am employed to 485
circulate this petition by ________________________________ 486
(Name and address of employer). (The preceding sentence shall be 487
completed as required by section 3501.38 of the Revised Code if 488
the circulator is being employed to circulate the petition.) 489
(Signed) ________________________ 490
(Address of circulator's permanent 491
residence in this state) 492
__________________________________ 493
(Circulator license number) ________________________ 494
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 495
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 496
(B) If the measure proposes a law, the heading of each 497
part of the petition shall be prepared as follows: 498
"INITIATIVE PETITION 499

H. B. No. 299 Page 19
As Introduced
Law proposed by initiative petition first to be submitted 500
to the General Assembly." 501
In all other respects, the form shall be as provided for 502
the submission of a constitutional amendment, except that the 503
text of the proposed law shall be prefaced by "Be it enacted by 504
the people of the state of Ohio." 505
The form for a supplementary initiative petition shall be 506
the same as that provided for an initiative petition, with the 507
exception that "supplementary" shall precede "initiative" in the 508
title thereof. 509
(C) The general provisions set forth in this section 510
relative to the form and order of an initiative petition shall 511
be, so far as practical, applicable to a referendum petition, 512
the heading of which shall be as follows: 513
"REFERENDUM PETITION 514
To be submitted to the electors for their approval or 515
rejection" 516
The title, which follows the heading, shall contain a 517
brief legislative history of the law, section, or item of law to 518
be referred. The text of the law so referred shall be followed 519
by the certification of the secretary of state, in accordance 520
with division (B)(2)(b) of section 3519.01 of the Revised Code, 521
that it has been compared with the copy of the enrolled act, on 522
file in the secretary of state's office, containing such law, 523
section, or item of law, and found to be correct. 524
The circulator of a referendum petition is not required to 525
provide a circulator license number. 526
(D) The secretary of state shall prescribe a form for part 527

H. B. No. 299 Page 20
As Introduced
petitions to be submitted during the ten-day period beginning on 528
the first day following the date that the secretary of state 529
notifies the chairperson of the committee interested in the 530
petition that the petition has an insufficient number of valid 531
signatures. The secretary of state shall provide to each 532
particular committee a different form that contains a unique 533
identifier and that is separate from the forms prescribed in 534
divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section. The secretary of 535
state shall make the form available to the committee only as 536
described in division (F) of section 3519.16 of the Revised 537
Code. The form shall not be considered a public record until 538
after the secretary of state makes it available to the committee 539
under that division. 540
The form shall comply with the requirements of Section 1g 541
of Article II, Ohio Constitution and, except as otherwise 542
provided in this division, with the requirements of divisions 543
(A), (B), and (C) of this section. 544
Sec. 3519.06. No initiative or referendum part-petition is 545
properly verified if it appears on the face thereof, or is made 546
to appear by a satisfactory evidence: 547
(A) That the statement required by section 3519.05 of the 548
Revised Code is not properly filled out; 549
(B) That the statement is not properly signed; 550
(C) That the statement is altered by erasure, 551
interlineation, or otherwise; 552
(D) That the statement is false in any respect; 553
(E) In the case of a statewide initiative petition, that 554
the circulator does not hold a valid circulator license as 555
required under section 3519.11 of the Revised Code; 556

H. B. No. 299 Page 21
As Introduced
(F) That any one person has affixed more than one 557
signature thereto. 558
Sec. 3519.11. (A) A person who circulates a statewide 559
initiative petition shall hold a valid circulator license issued 560
under this section. 561
(B) A person who wishes to circulate a statewide 562
initiative petition may apply to the secretary of state, on a 563
form prescribed by the secretary of state, for a circulator 564
license. The form shall require all of the following: 565
(1) That the applicant provide the applicant's name, date 566
of birth, and current residence address; 567
(2) That the applicant sign a statement affirming the 568
truth of the information the applicant has submitted; 569
(3) That the form be notarized within one year before the 570
date the form is submitted to the secretary of state. 571
(C) Not later than ten business days after receiving a 572
valid application for a circulator license under division (B) of 573
this section, the secretary of state shall issue a circulator 574
license to the applicant. The license shall include a unique 575
license number and shall be valid for twenty-four months after 576
the date it is issued. 577
(D) A person who has been issued a circulator license 578
under this section may apply for a renewed or updated license in 579
the same manner as for an initial license. 580
(E) The secretary of state shall deny a person a 581
circulator license, and shall revoke a person's existing 582
circulator license, if the secretary of state determines that 583
the person is not qualified to circulate a statewide initiative 584

H. B. No. 299 Page 22
As Introduced
petition. 585
(F) The secretary of state shall maintain a registry of 586
current and previously licensed circulators and make it 587
available to the boards of elections for purposes of verifying 588
part-petitions. The registry shall include all of the following 589
concerning each circulator: 590
(1) The person's name; 591
(2) The person's circulator license number; 592
(3) The issue date and expiration date of the person's 593
license. 594
(G) A completed application for a circulator license and 595
the registry of circulators described in division (F) of this 596
section are not subject to disclosure as public records under 597
section 149.43 of the Revised Code. 598
Section 2. That existing sections 3501.01, 3501.38, 599
3503.06, 3519.05, and 3519.06 of the Revised Code are hereby 600
repealed. 601
Section 3. A part-petition of a statewide initiative 602
petition, as defined in section 3501.01 of the Revised Code, as 603
amended by this act, that is signed by one or more electors 604
before the effective date of this section is not invalid on the 605
ground that the part-petition does not meet the requirements of 606
the Revised Code, as amended by this act, so long as the part- 607
petition meets the requirements of the Revised Code that were in 608
effect on the day before the effective date of this section. 609